North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159F. North Carolina Energy Development Authority.
§§ 159F-1 through 159F-9.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 16, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1993, c. 16, which repealed this Chapter, in s. 2 provides that upon the effective date of the act (July 1, 1993), the Secretary of Administration shall deliver all records and any remaining assets of the North Carolina Development Authority to the Director of the Energy Division of the Department of Commerce.